District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

44-1102.19a

Repayment of funds.

Repealed.

Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-212, § 219a, 43 DCR 4962
as added Oct. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 13-38, § 1602(c), 46 DCR 6373
July 12, 2001, D.C. Law 14-18, § 9(a), 48 DCR 4047
For temporary (90-day) amendment of section, see § 1602(c) of the Service Improvement and Fiscal Year 2000 Budget Support Emergency Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-110, July 28, 1999, 46 DCR 6320).